Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 8. Native Art Competitions.

Sec. 44.33.501.
Program of competitions.

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall direct a continuing program of competitions. The competitions shall be held each summer to select outstanding examples of Alaskan Native arts and crafts.

The Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development, after consulting with a committee from the Alaska Native Brotherhood and Sisterhood appointed by their councils from among the memberships of those organizations, shall adopt regulations for the competitions, providing for, but not limited to the following:

eligibility requirements for entrants;

categories for entry, such as basketwork, wood carving, pottery, stone work, ivory work, painting, etc.;

criterion for selecting category winners and grand prize winners;

transportation and display of entries;

prizes and awards for winning entrants which are restricted to ribbons, cups, plaques, etc.;

preparation of entry forms that

give the name and mailing address of the entrant,

show that each entry is the work of the entrant,

give the minimum price that the entrant will accept for the entry,

provide the entrant with a choice of having the entry sold, retained for display by the state, or returned to the entrant, and

identify and describe the entry; and

restricting the entrant from entering competitions in more than one region.

History.

(§ 2 ch 68 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS

45.65.080

. Renumbered in 1980.

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 44.33.502.
Regional competitions.

Four regional competitions shall be held each summer in the first, second, third, and fourth judicial districts established in AS

22.10.010

. First place and honorable mention awards shall be made in each category and one grand prize award and one honorable mention award shall be made for each region.

History.

(§ 3 ch 68 SLA 1960; am § 39 ch 12 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS 45.65.090. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.33.503.
Place of competition.

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall solicit invitations from the larger communities in each of the regions for holding the regional competition.
The community in each region which offers the best facilities and the greatest measure of cooperation for conducting the competition shall be selected as the location of the regional competition.

History.

(§ 4 ch 68 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS 45.65.100. Renumbered in 1980.

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 44.33.504.
Judges.

Judges at the regional competitions shall be selected by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development and composed of a panel of five, two of whom shall be selected from nominees of the Alaska Native Brotherhood and Sisterhood and three of whom shall be selected by the department on the basis of their knowledge and appreciation of Alaskan Native arts and crafts and of art in general.

History.

(§ 5 ch 68 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS 45.65.110. Renumbered in 1980.

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 44.33.505.
Sale of entries.

If authorized by the entrant, an entry not selected for display may be sold for not less than the price set by the entrant on the entry form.
The entry shall be transferred to the purchaser by competition officials on receipt of a money order or cashier’s check made out to the entrant.

History.

(§ 6 ch 68 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS 45.65.120. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 44.33.506.
Other displays.

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development may display or authorize the display of entries at places other than the regional competitions.

History.

(§ 8 ch 68 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS 45.65.130. Renumbered in 1980.

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 44.33.507.
Grants and assistance.

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development may accept grants of money and other assistance from private persons or groups, from political subdivisions of the state, or from others to conduct and promote annual competitions and displays.

History.

(§ 9 ch 68 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS 45.65.140. Renumbered in 1980.

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 44.33.512.
Temporary custody.

In order that the competitions may be held without undue disruption and in order that winning items may be displayed at other places, all entries submitted for judging shall be held in temporary custody by the state until they are no longer needed for display, at which time they shall be disposed of in accordance with the wishes of the entrant as set out on the entry form.

History.

(§ 10 ch 68 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS 45.65.150. Renumbered in 1980.

Secs. 44.33.530 — 44.33.550.
Alaska Foreign Offices. [Repealed, E.O. No. 65, § 3 (1987).]

Secs. 44.33.600 — 44.33.630.
Power Development Revolving Loan Fund. [Repealed, E.O. No. 75, § 5 (1989). For current law, see AS 44.83.500 — 44.83.530.]